New York, session 2025-2026, A11346.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The economic development law is amended by adding a new 2 section 134-a to read as follows: 3 § 134-a. Small business and content creator study. 1. For the purposes 4 of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Content creator" means a person who creates material to be shared 6 publicly on a social media platform. 7 (b) "Small business" means a retail establishment that has annual 8 gross revenues of less than five million dollars and employs twenty-five 9 or fewer employees. For purposes of determining whether an entity quali- 10 fies as a small business, the revenues of any parent entity, any subsid- 11 iary entities, and any entities owned or controlled by a common parent 12 entity shall be aggregated. 13 2. On or before January first, two thousand twenty-seven, the division 14 for small-business shall conduct a study by engaging in public outreach 15 to businesses and stakeholders to assess the amount of interest content 16 creators and small businesses have in participating in a pilot program 17 in which small businesses looking for support with marketing and adver- 18 tisement are matched with content creators who can use their social 19 media platforms to bring attention to such small businesses. 20 3. The division for small-business shall prepare a report on the find- 21 ings made by the study pursuant to subdivision two of this section. The 22 division for small-business shall transmit such report along with the 23 study to the governor, the speaker of the assembly, the temporary presi- 24 dent of the senate, the chair of the assembly small business committee, 25 the chair of the assembly economic development committee and the chair EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15836-01-6 A. 11346 2 1 of the senate commerce, economic development and small business commit- 2 tee no later than thirty days after the completion of such study. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 4 deemed repealed January 1, 2028.